Utah statutes.
7-1-313.   Requiring remedial action by institution in or about to be in unsound condition -- Assistance by insurers.

(1)  The commissioner may require any financial institution subject to the jurisdiction of the department that he finds to be or about to be in an unsafe or unsound condition to take corrective or remedial action as he considers appropriate to protect the interests of depositors, members, other creditors, and shareholders of the institution, and the general public.

(2)  An insurer of the accounts of a financial institution may make loans to, purchase the assets of, establish accounts in, or provide other assistance to a financial institution in order to correct or remedy an unsafe or unsound condition or to protect the interests of depositors, members, other creditors, and shareholders of the institution.  This assistance is subject to approval by the commissioner.

